District of Columbia statutes.
29-1001.05

Powers.

A limited cooperative association may sue and be sued in its own name and do all things necessary or convenient to carry on its activities affairs. An association may maintain an action against a member for harm caused to the association by the member’s violation of a duty to the association or of the organic law or organic rules.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(j)(2)(B), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities and affairs” for “activities.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 106 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.